Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-225
Suspend, defined.

Suspend shall mean to cause a temporary interruption of all rights and privileges of a license or the renewal thereof and all rights and privileges to obtain a permit.

Laws 1983, LB 259, § 11;

Laws 1985, LB 408, § 5;

R.S.Supp.,1985, § 9-140.07;

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 26;

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 24.